District of Columbia statutes.
10-1104.06

Repealed

Appropriations.

Repealed.

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1164, Pub. L. 90-596, title IV, § 406
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-207, § 6(c), 61 DCR 12690
1981 Ed., § 7-1021.
1973 Ed., § 7-922.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-207: Section 12(a) of D.C. Law 20-207 provided that §§ 2(a), 2(b)(1), 2(b)(2)(A), 2(b)(2)(B), 2(b)(2)(C), 2(c), 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 11 shall apply as of March 11, 2015.